Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.155

Limitation on number of shares subscribed in subscription offering permitted.

The number of shares which any person, or group of persons affiliated with each other or otherwise acting in concert, may subscribe for in the subscription offering may be made subject to a limit of not less than one percent of the total offering of shares.

[ 1981 c 85 s 30.]